Tennessee, session 114, SB0750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 20, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) Each law enforcement agency, except for the Tennessee bureau of
investigation (TBI), shall report monthly to the department of safety each interaction that
the law enforcement agency had with illegal aliens over the previous month. The report
must include the date of the interaction, the number of illegal aliens encountered, and a
description of identification documents, if any, in their possession. The law enforcement
agency shall include in the report copies of the identification documents found during an
interaction with an illegal alien. A law enforcement officer who arrests an illegal alien for
a crime and who suspects the illegal alien possesses fake identification documents shall
confiscate the identification documents. The law enforcement agency shall include
information about confiscated identification documents in the report.
(b) The department shall work with law enforcement agencies to standardize the
reporting criteria and process.
(c) The department shall use the reports submitted pursuant to subsection (a) to
develop a report detailing illegal alien presence and activity in this state. The
department shall share its reports with the Tennessee bureau of investigation on a
regular basis.
SB0750
000516
- 1 -

(d) The department shall provide a report to the general assembly by December
1 annually or at the request of the speaker of the senate or the speaker of the house of
representatives. This report must include an assessment of the population of illegal
aliens residing in this state and any associated criminal enterprises. The report must
also include a threat analysis for this state. The department shall structure the reports to
the general assembly so that ongoing investigations are not compromised by the
information shared.
(e) The department shall share its reports with law enforcement agencies to
ensure an integrated approach to addressing issues with illegal aliens and any unlawful
activities in which they are engaged.
(f) As used in this section, "illegal alien" means an individual who enters or
resides in the United States without authorization under federal law.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 000516